Colorado, session 2026A, HB1385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The Colorado district attorneys' council has sufficient unspent
funds available from prior appropriations to administer the behavioral
health support grant program in state fiscal year 2026-27; and
(b) It is therefore reasonable not to direct additional funds to the
Colorado district attorneys' council for this purpose for the 2026-27 fiscal
year.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-32-3502, add (1)(c)
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

as follows:
24-32-3502. Public defender and prosecutor behavioral health
support program - policies - report - fund - repeal.
(1) (c) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION,
FOR THE 2026-27 STATE FISCAL YEAR THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ALLOCATE
ONE HUNDRED PERCENT OF THE MONEY APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM
AND ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS RECEIVED BY THE DEPARTMENT
FOR THE PROGRAM TO THE OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (1)(c) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31,
2027.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1385

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1385